District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.193

Fiduciary duties when representing a landlord of leased property.

(a)

A licensee engaged by a landlord to lease property shall:

(1)

Perform in accordance with the terms of the brokerage relationship;

(2)

Promote the interests of the landlord by:

(A)

Seeking a tenant at the price and terms agreed in the brokerage relationship or at a price and terms acceptable to the landlord; however, the licensee shall not be obligated to seek additional offers to lease the property while the property is subject to a lease or a letter of intent to lease under which the tenant has not yet taken possession, unless agreed as part of the brokerage relationship, or unless the lease or the letter of intent to lease so provides;

(B)

Presenting in a timely manner all written offers or counteroffers to and from the landlord, even when the property is already subject to a lease or a letter of intent to lease;

(C)

Disclosing to the landlord material facts related to the property or concerning the transaction of which the licensee has actual knowledge; and

(D)

Accounting for in a timely manner all money and property received in which the landlord has or may have an interest;

(3)

Maintain confidentiality of all personal and financial information received from the client during the brokerage relationship and any other information that the client requests during the brokerage relationship be maintained confidential, unless otherwise provided by law or the landlord consents in writing to the release of such information;

(4)

Exercise ordinary care; and

(5)

Comply with all requirements of this section, fair housing statutes and regulations, and all other applicable statutes and regulations which are not in conflict with this section.

(b)

A licensee engaged by a landlord to lease property shall treat all prospective tenants honestly and shall not knowingly give them false information. A licensee engaged by a landlord shall disclose to prospective tenants all material adverse facts pertaining to the physical condition of the property which are actually known by the licensee. A licensee shall not be liable to a tenant for providing false information to the tenant if the false information was provided to the licensee by the landlord and the licensee did not have actual knowledge that the information was false or act in reckless disregard of the truth. No cause of action shall arise against any licensee for revealing information as required by this section or applicable law. Nothing in this subsection shall limit the right of a prospective tenant to inspect the physical condition of the property. Nothing in this section shall modify or limit in any way the provisions of § 42-1755(f) [repealed].

(c)

A licensee engaged by a landlord in a real estate transaction may, unless prohibited by law or the brokerage relationship, provide assistance to a tenant, or potential tenant, by performing ministerial acts. Performing such ministerial acts that are not inconsistent with part O of this subchapter shall not be construed to violate the licensee’s brokerage relationship with the landlord unless expressly prohibited by the terms of the brokerage relationship, nor shall performing such ministerial acts be construed to form a brokerage relationship with such tenant or potential tenant.

(d)

A licensee engaged by a landlord does not breach any duty or obligation owed to the landlord by showing alternative properties to prospective tenants, whether as clients or customers, or by representing other landlords who have other properties for lease.

(e)

Licensees shall disclose brokerage relationships pursuant to the provisions of this section.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-2853.192.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.193.